apertium-cy-en.en.dix.xml
<pardef n="f/all__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>alls</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>allen</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>alling</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>alling</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>alling</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
   

<pardef n="beg/et__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>otten</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
   
    
<pardef n="beg/in__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ins</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
       
    
<pardef n="h/old__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>old</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>old</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>olds</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eld</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>eld</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>olding</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>olding</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>olding</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
   
    
<pardef n="ben/d__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ds</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
    
     
<pardef n="cut__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
   
    

                        <e lm="begin"><i>beg</i><par n="beg/in__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="build"><i>buil</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="cut"><i>cut</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="fall"><i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="hold"><i>h</i><par n="h/old__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="lend"><i>len</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="let"><i>let</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="put"><i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="send"><i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="set"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="shut"><i>shut</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="spend"><i>spen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="fall down"><i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="send in"><i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="bet"><i>bet</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="underlet"><i>underlet</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="bend"><i>ben</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="split"><i>split</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="hit"><i>hit</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="upset"><i>upset</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
